Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 47.65.290.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“adult day care” means nonresidential care for a group of persons that offers supervision, custodial care, and other appropriate social, indoor and outdoor recreational, physical, medical, or psychological services for persons at risk of institutional placement;

“at risk of institutional placement” means that a person is either already a resident of an adult foster home or is likely to need placement in a 24-hour care residential or nursing facility, not including a mental health hospital;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“family respite care” means intermittent and substitute care that provides relief for a family caregiver or adult foster home provider by providing intermittent care in the form of companionship, temporary supervision, and minor personal care to a person who is at risk of institutional placement; the service may be provided either in the home of the client or the caregiver, including in an adult foster care home if that is the client’s residence;

“home care services” means homemaker services, chore services, personal care services, home health care services, or similar services in or around the residence of an older Alaskan or of a frail older person or similarly disabled adult, as defined in AS

47.65.100

;

“older Alaskan” means a resident of Alaska who is 60 years of age and older;

“service program” means the following general categories of services to older Alaskans, including reasonable costs of administration:

nutritional programs;

volunteer programs;

adult day care programs and family respite care services;

health services;

housing services;

legal services and assistance;

home health and homemaker services;

counseling;

information and referral services;

programs which train persons to work with or assist older Alaskans;

transportation services;

educational activities; and

employment services;

“sponsor” means the provider of one or more service programs or pilot projects for the benefit of older Alaskans, including

a municipality of the state;

a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of the state; and

an educational institution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1980; am §§ 10-12 ch 79 SLA 1981; §§ 5, 6 ch 37 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 45 SLA 1994; am § 18 ch 131 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 108 § 87 (2003); am § 20 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.65.060. Renumbered in 1990. Reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the terms defined and in 1990 and 1994 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 2003, “AS

47.45.200

” was substituted for “AS 47.44.200” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.44.200.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, repealed and reenacted paragraph (3).